Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2. Solid Waste Management.
§ 10.1-1408.4.
Landfill siting review.

Before granting a permit which approves site suitability for a new municipal solid waste landfill, the Director shall determine, in writing, that the site on which the landfill is to be constructed is suitable for the construction and operation of such a landfill. In making his determination, the Director shall consider and address, in addition to such others as he deems appropriate, the following factors:

Based on a written, site-specific report prepared by the Virginia Department of Transportation, the adequacy of transportation facilities that will be available to serve the landfill, including the impact of the landfill on local traffic volume, road congestion, and highway safety;

The potential impact of the proposed landfill on parks and recreational areas, public water supplies, marine resources, wetlands, historic sites, fish and wildlife, water quality, and tourism; and

The geologic suitability of the proposed site, including proximity to areas of seismic activity and karst topography.The applicant shall provide such information on these factors as the Director may request.

In addition to such other types of locations as may be determined by the Board, no new municipal solid waste landfill shall be constructed:

In a 100-year flood plain;

In any tidal wetland or nontidal wetland contiguous to any surface water body, except in accordance with §

10.1-1408.5

;

Within three miles upgradient of any existing surface or groundwater public water supply intake or reservoir. However, a new municipal solid waste landfill may be constructed within a closer distance but no closer than one mile from any existing surface or groundwater public water supply intake or reservoir if: (i) the proposed landfill would meet all of the other requirements of this chapter and subtitle D of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, including alternative liner systems approved in accordance with that Act; (ii) the permit requires that groundwater protection standards be established and approved by the Director prior to the receipt of waste; (iii) the permit requires installation of at least two synthetic liners under the waste disposal areas and requires leachate collection systems to be installed above and below the uppermost liner; (iv) the permit requires all groundwater monitoring wells located within the facility’s boundary and between the landfill and any water supply intake to be sampled quarterly and the results reported to the Department within 15 days of the owner or operator receiving the laboratory analysis; and (v) the proposed landfill meets any other conditions deemed necessary by the Director, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, to protect against groundwater and surface water contamination. In the Counties of Mecklenburg and Halifax, a new municipal solid waste landfill may be exempt from the provisions of this subdivision and may be constructed within a shorter distance from an existing surface or groundwater public water supply intake or reservoir if the Director determines that such distance would not be detrimental to human health and the environment;

In any area vulnerable to flooding resulting from dam failures;

Over a sinkhole or less than 100 feet above a solution cavern associated with karst topography;

In any park or recreational area, wildlife management area or area designated by any federal or state agency as the critical habitat of any endangered species; or

Over an active fault.

There shall be no additional exemptions granted from this section unless (i) the proponent has submitted to the Department an assessment of the potential impact to public water supplies, the need for the exemption, and the alternatives considered and (ii) the Department has made the information available for public review for at least 60 days prior to the first day of the next Regular Session of the General Assembly.

History.

1999, cc. 584, 613, 947; 2001, c. 767; 2003, c. 834; 2005, c. 920.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1999 act having been

10.1-1408.3

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 767 added the language beginning “however” at the end of subdivision B 3.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 834 substituted “however in the Counties of Mecklenburg and Halifax” for “however, in any county with a population between 29,200 and 30,000, according to the 1990 United States Census” in subdivision B 3.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 920 added the exception at the end of subdivision B 2; divided the former provisions of subdivision B 3 into the present first and third sentences thereof, inserted the present second sentence and “exempt from the provisions of this subdivision and may be” in the third sentence, and made a related change; and added subsection C.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Policy under the Environmental Justice Act –

The policy established by the Virginia Environmental Justice Act ( § 2.2-234 et seq.) is a factor that must be considered by the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality in making his determination about whether the site for a potential landfill is suitable under §

10.1-1408.4

of the Virginia Waste Management Act. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Ghazala F. Hashmi, Member, Senate of Virginia, 20-064, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 34 (12/3/21).

§ 10.1-1408.5.
Special provisions regarding wetlands.

The Director shall not issue any solid waste permit for a new municipal solid waste landfill or the expansion of a municipal solid waste landfill that would be sited in a wetland, provided that this subsection shall not apply to subsection B or the (i) expansion of an existing municipal solid waste landfill located in the City of Danville or the City of Suffolk when the owner or operator of the landfill is an authority created pursuant to §

15.2-5102

that has applied for a permit under § 404 of the federal Clean Water Act prior to January 1, 1989, and the owner or operator has received a permit under § 404 of the federal Clean Water Act and the Virginia Water Resources and Wetlands Protection Program, Article 2.2 (§ 62.1-44.15:20 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1, or (ii) construction of a new municipal solid waste landfill in Mecklenburg County and provided that the municipal solid waste landfills covered under clauses (i) and (ii) have complied with all other applicable federal and state environmental laws and regulations. It is expressly understood that while the provisions of this section provide an exemption to the general siting prohibition contained herein; it is not the intent in so doing to express an opinion on whether or not the project should receive the necessary environmental and regulatory permits to proceed. For the purposes of this section, the term “expansion of a municipal solid waste landfill” shall include the siting and construction of new cells or the expansion of existing cells at the same location.

The Director may issue a solid waste permit for the expansion of a municipal solid waste landfill located in a wetland only if the following conditions are met: (i) the proposed landfill site is at least 100 feet from any surface water body and at least one mile from any tidal wetland; (ii) the Director determines, based upon the existing condition of the wetland system, including, but not limited to, sedimentation, toxicity, acidification, nitrification, vegetation, and proximity to existing permitted waste disposal areas, roads or other structures, that the construction or restoration of a wetland system in another location in accordance with a Virginia Water Protection Permit approved by the State Water Control Board would provide higher quality wetlands; and (iii) the permit requires a minimum two-to-one wetlands mitigation ratio. This subsection shall not apply to the exemptions provided in clauses (i) and (ii) of subsection A.

Ground water monitoring shall be conducted at least quarterly by the owner or operator of any existing solid waste management landfill, accepting municipal solid waste, that was constructed on a wetland, has a potential hydrologic connection to such a wetland in the event of an escape of liquids from the facility, or is within a mile of such a wetland, unless the Director determines that less frequent monitoring is necessary. This provision shall not limit the authority of the Board or the Director to require that monitoring be conducted more frequently than quarterly. If the landfill is one that accepts only ash, ground water monitoring shall be conducted semiannually, unless more frequent monitoring is required by the Board or the Director. All results shall be reported to the Department.

This section shall not apply to landfills which impact less than two acres of nontidal wetlands.

For purposes of this section, “wetland” means any tidal wetland or nontidal wetland contiguous to any tidal wetland or surface water body.

There shall be no additional exemptions granted from this section unless (i) the proponent has submitted to the Department an assessment of the potential impact to wetlands, the need for the exemption, and the alternatives considered and (ii) the Department has made the information available for public review for at least 60 days prior to the first day of the next Regular Session of the General Assembly.

History.

1999, c. 876; 2001, c. 767; 2005, c. 920; 2007, cc. 659, 813.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1999 act having been

10.1-1408.3

.

Editor’s note.

For § 404 of the Clean Water Act, referred to in subsection A above, see 33 U.S.C.S. § 1344.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 767, in subsection A, substituted “subsection” for “paragraph” near the beginning of the subsection, inserted the “(i)” designation, and inserted “or (ii) construction of a new municipal solid waste landfill in any county with a population between 29,200 and 30,000, according to the 1990 United States Census, and provided that the municipal solid waste landfills covered under clauses (i) and (ii) have” near the end of the first sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 920 inserted “subsection B or” in the introductory clause of the first sentence of subsection A and added the last sentence thereof; redesignated former subsections B through D as present subsections C through E; added present subsections B and F; deleted “of Environmental Quality” at the end of subsection C; and substituted “two” for “1.25” in subsection D.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 659 substituted “the Virginia Water Resources and Wetlands Protection Program, Article 2.2 (§ 6.1-44.15:20 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1” for “§ 62.1-44.15:5 of this Code” in clause (i) in subsection A.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813, in subsection A, substituted “the City of Danville or the City of Suffolk” for “a city with a population between 41,000 and 52,500” in clause (i) and “Mecklenburg County” for “any county with a population between 29,200 and 30,000, according to the 1990 United States Census” in clause (ii).

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

§ 10.1-1409.
Revocation or amendment of permits.

Any permit issued by the Director pursuant to this article may be revoked, amended or suspended on any of the following grounds or on such other grounds as may be provided by the regulations of the Board:

The permit holder has violated any regulation or order of the Board, any condition of a permit, any provision of this chapter, or any order of a court, where such violation results in a release of harmful substances into the environment or poses a threat of release of harmful substances into the environment or presents a hazard to human health, or the violation is representative of a pattern of serious or repeated violations which, in the opinion of the Director, demonstrate the permittee’s disregard for or inability to comply with applicable laws, regulations or requirements;

The sanitary landfill or other facility used for disposal, storage or treatment of solid waste is maintained or operated in such a manner as to pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment;

The sanitary landfill, or other facility used for the disposal, storage or treatment of solid waste, because of its location, construction or lack of protective construction or measures to prevent pollution, poses a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment;

Leachate or residues from the sanitary landfill or other facility used for the disposal, storage or treatment of solid waste pose a substantial threat of contamination or pollution of the air, surface waters or ground water;

The person to whom the permit was issued abandons or ceases to operate the facility, or sells, leases or transfers the facility without properly transferring the permit in accordance with the regulations of the Board;

As a result of changes in key personnel, the Director finds that the requirements necessary for issuance of a permit are no longer satisfied;

The applicant has knowingly or willfully misrepresented or failed to disclose a material fact in applying for a permit or in his disclosure statement, or in any other report or certification required under this law or under the regulations of the Board, or has knowingly or willfully failed to notify the Director of any material change to the information in its disclosure statement; or

Any key personnel has been convicted of any of the following crimes punishable as felonies under the laws of the Commonwealth or the equivalent thereof under the laws of any other jurisdiction: murder; kidnapping; gambling; robbery; bribery; extortion; criminal usury; arson; burglary; theft and related crimes; forgery and fraudulent practices; fraud in the offering, sale, or purchase of securities; alteration of motor vehicle identification numbers; unlawful manufacture, purchase, use or transfer of firearms; unlawful possession or use of destructive devices or explosives; violation of the Drug Control Act, Chapter 34 (§ 54.1-3400 et seq.) of Title 54.1; racketeering; violation of antitrust laws; or has been adjudged by an administrative agency or a court of competent jurisdiction to have violated the environmental protection laws of the United States, the Commonwealth or any other state and the Director determines that such conviction or adjudication is sufficiently probative of the applicant’s inability or unwillingness to operate the facility in a lawful manner, as to warrant denial, revocation, amendment or suspension of the permit.In making such determination, the Director shall consider:

The nature and details of the acts attributed to key personnel;

The degree of culpability of the applicant, if any;

The applicant’s policy or history of discipline of key personnel for such activities;

Whether the applicant has substantially complied with all rules, regulations, permits, orders and statutes applicable to the applicant’s activities in Virginia;

Whether the applicant has implemented formal management controls to minimize and prevent the occurrence of such violations; and

Mitigation based upon demonstration of good behavior by the applicant including, without limitation, prompt payment of damages, cooperation with investigations, termination of employment or other relationship with key personnel or other persons responsible for the violations or other demonstrations of good behavior by the applicant that the Director finds relevant to its decision.

The Director may amend or attach conditions to a permit when:

There is a significant change in the manner and scope of operation which may require new or additional permit conditions or safeguards to protect the public health and environment;

There is found to be a possibility of pollution causing significant adverse effects on the air, land, surface water or ground water;

Investigation has shown the need for additional equipment, construction, procedures and testing to ensure the protection of the public health and the environment from significant adverse effects; or

The amendment is necessary to meet changes in applicable regulatory requirements.

If the Director finds that solid wastes are no longer being stored, treated or disposed at a facility in accordance with Board regulations, he may revoke the permit issued for such facility. As a condition to granting or continuing in effect a permit, he may also require the permittee to provide perpetual care and surveillance of the facility.

If the Director summarily suspends a permit pursuant to subdivision 18 of §

10.1-1402

, the Director shall hold a conference pursuant to § 2.2-4019 within forty-eight hours to consider whether to continue the suspension pending a hearing to amend or revoke the permit, or to issue any other appropriate order. Notice of the hearing shall be delivered at the conference or sent at the time the permit is suspended. Any person whose permit is suspended by the Director shall cease activity for which the permit was issued until the permit is reinstated by the Director or by a court.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-272; 1988, cc. 569, 891; 1990, c. 919.

§ 10.1-1410.
Financial responsibility for abandoned facilities; penalties.

The Board shall promulgate regulations which ensure that if a facility for the disposal, transfer, or treatment of solid waste is abandoned, the costs associated with protecting the public health and safety from the consequences of such abandonment may be recovered from the person abandoning the facility. A facility that receives solid waste from a ship, barge or other vessel and is regulated under §

10.1-1454.1

shall be considered a transfer facility for the purposes of this subsection.

The regulations may include provisions for bonding, the creation of a trust fund to be maintained within the Department, self-insurance, other forms of commercial insurance, or such other mechanism as the Department may deem appropriate. Regulations governing the amount thereof shall take into consideration the potential for contamination and injury by the solid waste, the cost of disposal of the solid waste and the cost of restoring the facility to a safe condition. Any bonding requirements shall include a provision authorizing the use of personal bonds or other similar surety deemed sufficient to provide the protections specified in subsection A upon a finding by the Director that commercial insurance or surety bond cannot be obtained in the voluntary market due to circumstances beyond the control of the permit holder. Any commercial insurance or surety obtained in the voluntary market shall be written by an insurer licensed pursuant to Chapter 10 (§ 38.2-1000 et seq.) of Title 38.2.

No state governmental agency shall be required to comply with such regulations.

Forfeiture of any financial obligation imposed pursuant to this section shall not relieve any holder of a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of this article of any other legal obligations for the consequences of abandonment of any facility.

Any funds forfeited prior to July 1, 1995, pursuant to this section and the regulations of the Board shall be paid over to the county, city or town in which the abandoned facility is located. The county, city or town in which the facility is located shall expend forfeited funds as necessary to restore and maintain the facility in a safe condition.

Any funds forfeited on or after July 1, 1995, pursuant to this section and the regulations of the Board shall be paid over to the Director. The Director shall then expend forfeited funds as necessary solely to restore and maintain the facility in a safe condition. Nothing in this section shall require the Director to expend funds from any other source to carry out the activities contemplated under this subsection.

Any person who knowingly and willfully abandons a solid waste management facility without proper closure or without providing adequate financial assurance instruments for such closure shall, if such failure to close results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be liable to the Commonwealth and any political subdivision for the costs incurred in abating, controlling, preventing, removing, or containing such harm or threat.Any person who knowingly and willfully abandons a solid waste management facility without proper closure or without providing adequate financial assurance instruments for such closure shall, if such failure to close results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-273; 1987, cc. 258, 291; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 702; 1993, c. 837; 1995, c. 739; 2000, cc. 137, 138.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felonies, see §

18.2-10

. As to special orders requiring that owner file plan to abate, control, prevent, remove, or contain any substantial and imminent threat to public health or the environment, see § 62.1-44.15:1.1.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 137, in subsection B, substituted “include provisions for bonding” for “include bonding requirements” in the first sentence, and added the fourth sentence.

The 2000 amendment by c. 138, in subsection A, inserted “transfer” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

§ 10.1-1410.1.
Sanitary landfill final closure plans; notification requirements.

When any owner or operator of a sanitary landfill submits by certified mail a final closure plan in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and the regulations adopted thereunder, the Department shall within ninety days of its receipt of such plan, notify by certified mail the owner or operator of the Department’s decision to approve or disapprove the final closure plan. The ninety-day period shall begin on the day the Department receives the plan by certified mail.

History.

1988, cc. 332, 891.

§ 10.1-1410.2.
Landfill postclosure monitoring, maintenance and plans.

The owner and operator of any solid waste landfill permitted under this chapter shall be responsible for ensuring that such landfill is properly closed in accordance with the Board’s regulations and that the landfill is maintained and monitored after closure so as to protect human health and the environment. Maintenance and monitoring of solid waste landfills after closure shall be in accordance with the Board’s regulations. At all times during the operational life of a solid waste landfill, the owner and operator shall provide to the Director satisfactory evidence of financial assurance consistent with all federal and state laws and regulations to ensure that the landfill will be:

Closed in accordance with the Board’s regulations and the closure plan approved for the landfill; and

Monitored and maintained after closure, for such period of time as provided in the Board’s regulations or for such additional period as the Director shall determine is necessary, in accordance with a postclosure plan approved by the Director.

Not less than 180 days prior to the completion of the postclosure monitoring and maintenance period as prescribed by the Board’s regulations or by the Director, the owner or operator shall submit to the Director a certificate, signed by a professional engineer licensed in the Commonwealth, that postclosure monitoring and maintenance have been completed in accordance with the postclosure plan. The certificate shall be accompanied by an evaluation, prepared by a professional engineer licensed in the Commonwealth and signed by the owner or operator, assessing and evaluating the landfill’s potential for harm to human health and the environment in the event that postclosure monitoring and maintenance are discontinued. If the Director determines that continued postclosure monitoring or maintenance is necessary to prevent harm to human health or the environment, he shall extend the postclosure period for such additional time as the Director deems necessary to protect human health and the environment and shall direct the owner or operator to submit a revised postclosure plan and to continue postclosure monitoring and maintenance in accordance therewith. Requirements for financial assurance as set forth in subsection A shall apply throughout such extended postclosure period.

History.

1999, cc. 584, 613, 947.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

§ 10.1-1410.3.
Operating burn pits at closed landfills.

The Department shall develop policies and procedures to allow for the infrequent burning of vegetative waste at permitted landfills that have ceased accepting waste but have not been released from postclosure care requirements. The policies and procedures developed shall include measures to ensure protection of public health and the environment, including (i) limits to the amount of vegetative waste that may be burned, (ii) the types of materials that may be burned, (iii) the frequency of the burning, (iv) the length of time the burning occurs, and (v) an evaluation of other alternatives for managing the vegetative waste. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city or locality from exercising its authority to regulate such facilities by requiring among other things, permits or approvals.

History.

2006, c. 19.

§ 10.1-1411.
Regional and local solid waste management plans.

The Board is authorized to promulgate regulations specifying requirements for local and regional solid waste management plans.To implement regional plans, the Governor may designate regional boundaries. The governing bodies of the counties, cities and towns within any region so designated shall be responsible for the development and implementation of a comprehensive regional solid waste management plan in cooperation with any planning district commission or commissions in the region. Where a county, city or town is not part of a regional plan, it shall develop and implement a local solid waste management plan in accordance with the Board’s regulations. For purposes of this section, each region or locality so designated shall constitute a solid waste planning unit.

The Board’s regulations shall include all aspects of solid waste management including waste reduction, recycling and reuse, storage, treatment, and disposal and shall require that consideration be given to the handling of all types of nonhazardous solid waste generated in the region or locality. In promulgating such regulations, the Board shall consider urban concentrations, geographic conditions, markets, transportation conditions, and other appropriate factors and shall provide for reasonable variances and exemptions thereto, as well as variances or exemptions from the minimum recycling rates specified herein when market conditions beyond the control of a county, city, town, or region make such mandatory rates unreasonable.

The Board’s regulations shall permit the following credits, provided that the aggregate of all such credits permitted shall not exceed five percentage points of the annual municipal solid waste recycling rate achieved for each solid waste planning unit:

A credit of one ton for each ton of recycling residue generated in Virginia and deposited in a landfill permitted under subsection M of §

10.1-1408.1

;

A credit of two percentage points of the minimum recycling rate mandated for the solid waste planning unit for a source reduction program that is implemented with the solid waste planning unit. The existence and operation of such a program shall be certified by the solid waste planning unit;

A credit of one ton for each ton of any solid waste material that is reused; and

A credit of one ton for each ton of any nonmunicipal solid waste material that is recycled.

Each solid waste planning unit shall maintain a minimum recycling rate for municipal solid waste generated within the solid waste planning unit pursuant to the following schedule:

Except as provided in subdivision 2, each solid waste planning unit shall maintain a minimum 25 percent recycling rate; or

Each solid waste planning unit shall maintain a minimum 15 percent recycling rate if it has (i) a population density rate of less than 100 persons per square mile according to the most recent United States Census, or (ii) a not seasonally adjusted civilian unemployment rate for the immediately preceding calendar year that is at least 50 percent greater than the state average as reported by the Virginia Employment Commission for such year.After July 1, 2007, no permit for a new sanitary landfill, incinerator, or waste-to-energy facility, or for an expansion, increase in capacity, or increase in the intake rate of an existing sanitary landfill, incinerator, or waste-to-energy facility shall be issued until the solid waste planning unit within which the facility is located has a solid waste management plan approved by the Board in accordance with the regulations, except as provided in this subsection. Failure to attain a mandated municipal solid waste recycling rate shall not be the sole cause for the denial of any permit or permit amendment, except as provided herein for sanitary landfills, incinerators, or waste-to-energy facilities, provided that all components of the solid waste management plan for the planning unit are in compliance with the regulations. The provisions of this subsection shall not be applicable to permits or permit amendments required for the operation or regulatory compliance of any existing facility, regardless of type, nor shall it be cause for the delay of any technical or administrative review of pending amendments thereto.

Each solid waste planning unit or locality with a population of greater than 100,000 persons according to the most recent United States census shall prepare and submit a recycling survey report to the Department of Environmental Quality annually. Each solid waste planning unit or locality with a population of 100,000 or less according to the most recent United States census shall prepare and submit a recycling survey report to the Department of Environmental Quality once every four years. Recycling survey reports submitted once every four years shall only be required to include information for the most recent single year. The first reports submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted by April 30, 2013, for the reporting year ending December 31, 2012.

If a county levies a consumer utility tax and the ordinance provides that revenues derived from such source, to the extent necessary, be used for solid waste disposal, the county may charge a town or its residents, establishments and institutions an amount not to exceed their pro rata cost, based upon population for such solid waste management if the town levies a consumer utility tax. This shall not prohibit a county from charging for disposal of industrial or commercial waste on a county-wide basis, including that originating within the corporate limits of towns.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-274; 1987, c. 249; 1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 440; 1990, cc. 574, 781; 1991, c. 237; 1995, c. 216; 1997, c. 495; 2006, cc. 7, 40; 2012, c. 834.

Cross references.

As to local recycling and waste disposal, see §

15.2-928

. As to ordinances requiring recycling reports, see §

15.2-939

. As to Virginia Solid Waste or Recycling Revolving Fund, see § 62.1-241.1 et seq.

The 1997 amendment,

in the third paragraph, deleted the former second and third sentences which read: “The regulations shall require that local or regional plans identify how the following minimum recycling rates shall be achieved: ten percent by 1991, fifteen percent by 1993, and twenty-five percent by 1995. Following 1995, local and regional solid waste planning units shall maintain a minimum twenty-five percent recycling rate through 1997 and shall report their 1997 recycling rates to the Department by May 1, 1998”; added the present fourth paragraph; and substituted “July 1, 2000” for “July 1, 1992” in the fifth paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 7 and 40 are nearly identical, and inserted the present subsection and subdivision designations; added the last sentence in subsection A; deleted the last two sentences of subsection B, which read: “The regulations shall permit a credit of one ton for each one ton of recycling residue generated in Virginia and deposited in a landfill permitted under subsection L of §

10.1-1408.1

. The total annual credits shall not exceed one fifth of the twenty-five percent requirement”; added subsection C; and in subsection D, rewrote the first paragraph, added subdivisions D 1 and D 2, and rewrote the next-to-last paragraph.

Subsection D is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 834 inserted subsection E and redesignated former subsection E as subsection F, and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey on environmental law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 625 (1989).

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Amendment to solid waste management plan. —

Public service authority may elect not to submit to the Department of Environmental Quality a proposed amendment to a solid waste management plan that it determines is not necessary or does not conform to the regional solid waste management plan for its area. The authority is not entitled to charge a fee for services related to processing and reviewing a proposed amendment and also cannot obtain reimbursement from the Department for costs and time devoted to the review as part of the process for the associated environmental permit. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frederick M. Quayle, Member, Senate of Virginia, 07-021, 2007 Va. AG LEXIS 23 (6/26/07).

§ 10.1-1412.
Contracts by counties, cities and towns.

Any county, city or town may enter into contracts for the supply of solid waste to resource recovery facilities.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-275; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1413.
State aid to localities for solid waste disposal.

To assist localities in the collection, transportation, disposal and management of solid waste in accordance with federal and state laws, regulations and procedures, each county, city and town may receive for each fiscal year from the general fund of the state treasury sums appropriated for such purposes. The Director shall distribute such grants on a quarterly basis, in advance, in accordance with Board regulations, to those counties, cities and towns which submit applications therefor.

Any county, city or town applying for and receiving such funds shall utilize the funds only for the collection, transportation, disposal or management of solid waste. The Director shall cause the use and expenditure of such funds to be audited and all funds not used for the specific purposes stated herein shall be refunded to the general fund.

All funds granted under the provisions of this section shall be conditioned upon and subject to the satisfactory compliance by the county, city or town with applicable federal and state legislation and regulations. The Director may conduct periodic inspections to ensure satisfactory compliance.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-276; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1413.1.
Waste information and assessment program.

The Department shall report by June 30 of each year the amount of solid waste, by weight or volume, disposed of in the Commonwealth during the preceding calendar year. The report shall identify solid waste by the following categories: (i) municipal solid waste; (ii) construction and demolition debris; (iii) incinerator ash; (iv) sludge other than sludge that is land applied in accordance with § 62.1-44.19:3; and (v) tires. For each such category the report shall include an estimate of the amount that was generated outside of the Commonwealth and the jurisdictions where such waste originated, if known. The report shall also estimate the amount of solid waste managed or disposed of by each of the following methods: (i) recycling; (ii) composting; (iii) landfilling; and (iv) incineration.

All permitted facilities that treat, store or dispose of solid waste shall provide the Department not more than annually, upon request, with such information in their possession as is reasonably necessary to prepare the report required by this section. At the option of the facility owner, the data collected may include an accounting of the facility’s economic benefits to the locality where the facility is located including the value of disposal and recycling facilities provided to the locality at no cost or reduced cost, direct employment associated with the facility, and other economic benefits resulting from the facility during the preceding calendar year. No facility shall be required pursuant to this section to provide information that is a trade secret as defined in § 59.1-336.

This section shall not apply to captive waste management facilities.

History.

1997, c. 512.